http://www.lib.noaa.gov/edocs/noaahistory.html

   [A History of NOAA, Being a Compilation of Facts and Figures Regarding
   the Life and Times of the Original Whole Earth Agency. Compiled by
   Eileen L. Shea, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, 44
   pp., 1987]

                              A HISTORY OF NOAA

                           BEING A COMPILATION OF

                              FACTS AND FIGURES

                        REGARDING THE LIFE AND TIMES

                                   OF THE

                         ORIGINAL WHOLE EARTH AGENCY

                                COMPILED BY:

                               EILEEN L. SHEA
                         NOAA REPRESENTATIVE TO THE
                           DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
                             HISTORICAL COUNCIL

                                    1987

                                 Edited by:

                                Skip Theberge
                            NOAA Central Library

                                    1999

                                    ( i )

                          Notes and Acknowledgments

   The following History was begun as NOAA's contribution to a
   Department-wide effort to produce a Commerce History which would serve
   as the Department's contribution to the national celebration of the
   Bicentennial of the Constitution. In addition to serving as source
   material to staff of the Department's Historical Council, I thought it
   might be useful to distribute the NOAA History, in the entirety, within
   the Agency.

   Most of the material in the History was drawn from existing documents
   -- published and unpublished. I have, wherever possible, given credit
   to the authors responsible for those earlier works - especially in
   those cases where, as with Dane Konop's history of the National Ocean
   Survey, highlights of significant historical events were used almost
   verbatim. I am grateful to these individuals as well as the anonymous
   authors of the countless internal agency documents used in researching
   the History. If readers of this document can identify any of these
   unidentified contributors, I'd appreciate an opportunity to give them
   due credit!

   This History is meant to be an internal agency reference document and
   there are no plans to publish or distribute it publicly. I learned a
   great deal about this exciting agency as I compiled the document and
   thought that others in the NOAA family might find it interesting as
   well. We are all part of a dynamic organization that continues to touch
   the lives of every citizen of the United States every day. We can and
   should take pride not only in our past accomplishments but also in the
   future promise of this original "whole earth" agency.

   I offer my personal thanks to all the people who made this history
   possible and a special "thank you" to Ms. Julie Campbell, Office of
   Legislative Affairs, for her invaluable assistance.

   Eileen L. Shea
   NOAA Representative, DOC
   Historical Council

                                    - 1 -

                          NOAA -- SOME PRE-HISTORY

                                Introduction

     The oceans and atmosphere are interacting parts of the total
     environmental system upon which we depend, not only for the quality
     of our lives, but for life itself.

     We face immediate and compelling needs for better protection of life
     and property from natural hazards, and for a better understanding of
     the total environment -- an understanding which will enable us more
     effectively to monitor and predict its actions, and ultimately,
     perhaps to exercise some degree of control over them.

     We also face a compelling need for exploration and development
     leading to the intelligent use of our marine resources. We must
     understand the nature of these resources, and assure their
     development without either contaminating the marine environment or
     upsetting its balance.

     Establishment of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration
     -- NOAA -- within the Department of Commerce would enable us to
     approach these tasks in a coordinated way. [1]

   With these words, published in July 1970, President Richard M. Nixon
   proposed the creation of a new agency -- the National Oceanic and
   Atmospheric Administration (NOAA).

   The proposal, which was coupled with the creation of the Environmental
   Protection Agency, was part of a reorganization effort, which,
   according to the reorganization plan itself, was designed to unify the
   nation's widely scattered, piece-meal environmental activities and
   provide a rational and systematic approach to understanding,
   protecting, developing and enhancing the total environment. In addition
   to a specific responsibility for the rational development and
   conservation of marine fisheries, NOAA was to lead the development of a
   consolidated national oceanic and atmospheric research and development
   program and provide a variety of scientific and technical services to
   other Federal agencies, private sector interests and the general
   public.

   The goals, responsibilities and programs of NOAA today reflect a
   continued commitment to the philosophy which created it. NOAA's primary
   mission and the ultimate goal of all its activities is to predict
   environmental changes on a wide range of time and space scales in order
   to protect life and property, and provide industry and government
   decision-makers with a reliable base of scientific information.

   Specifically, NOAA is a science-based agency which has the
   responsibility to predict changes in the oceanic and atmospheric
   environments and living marine resources, and to provide related data,
   information, and services to the public, industry, the research
   community, and other government agencies. These efforts range from
   warnings of severe events on short time-scales to information on
   climate shifts over decades or more. The main purpose of these

                                    - 2 -

   efforts is to support NOAA's operational environmental warning,
   forecast, prediction, assessment, and information management
   responsibilities.

   Just as they fulfill NOAA's environmental prediction responsibility,
   most, if not all, of the Agency's activities also contribute to the
   major Department of Commerce goal of Stimulating Productivity and
   Economic Development. Providing reliable forecasts and warnings of
   changing environmental conditions (like severe weather) protects life
   and property and enables industry to take appropriate actions. NOAA's
   programs to predict and assess significant changes in the ocean,
   coastal and Great Lakes environments ensures the safe, efficient, and
   cost-effective use of those marine environments and their resources and
   promotes the development of associated industry. Providing reliable
   fishery stock assessments and projections can significantly enhance the
   magnitude of the contribution of the domestic fishing industry to the
   U.S. balance of trade.

                                 Background

   The creation of NOAA was largely the result of an effort which began in
   June 1966 with enactment of the Marine Resources and Engineering
   Development Act of 1966 (P.L. 89-454). The Act declared it to be the
   policy of the United States to:

     develop, encourage, and maintain a coordinated, comprehensive, and
     long-range national program in marine science for the benefit of
     mankind, to assist in protection of health and property, enhancement
     of commerce, transportation, and national security, rehabilitation
     of our commercial fisheries, and increased utilization of these and
     other resources.

   To ensure the effective implementation of this policy, the Act created
   a Commission on Marine Science, Engineering and Resources to review and
   assess existing and planned U.S. marine science activities and
   recommend the required national oceanographic program and Governmental
   organizational plan.

   The Commission was comprised of fifteen members, appointed by the
   President, representing Federal and State governments, industry,
   academia, and other institutions with programs or interest in marine
   science and technology. The Commission was chaired by Julius A.
   Stratton, Chairman of the Ford Foundation, and included: Leon Jaworski
   (then Attorney with Fulbright, Crooker, Freeman, Bates and Jaworski),
   John H. Perry, Jr. (President Perry Publications, Inc.), John Knauss
   (Dean, Graduate School of Oceanography, University of Rhode Island),
   and Robert M. White (Administrator of the Commerce Department's
   Environmental Science Services Administration). As specified in the
   Act, the Commission was provided with four Congressional advisors
   including former Senator Warren G. Magnuson of Washington -- a name
   which is associated with much of this nation's ocean-related
   legislation. The "Stratton Commission", as it came to be called, began
   deliberations in early 1967 and on January 9, 1969 submitted their
   final report to the President and Congress. That document, Our Nation
   and the Sea: A Plan for National Action, set the stage for the
   evolution of this Nation's current programs in marine science and
   resource development.

                                    - 3 -

   Of particular interest was the Commission's recommendation to create a
   new National Oceanic and Atmospheric Agency which would administer the
   Nation's principal civil marine and atmospheric programs. The
   Commission was largely driven by the need to ensure the "full and wise
   use of the marine environment" but, in reviewing the need to describe,
   understand and predict global ocean processes, they recognized the need
   to address the oceans and atmosphere as interactive components of the
   global environment. As a result, they recommended that the new Agency
   incorporate atmospheric science as well.

   As envisioned by the Commission, the new independent Agency was to be
   initially composed of:

          - The U.S. Coast Guard;

          - The Environmental Science Services Administration of the
          Department of Commerce;

          - The Bureau of Commercial Fisheries and the marine and
          anadromous fisheries functions of the Bureau of Sport Fisheries
          and Wildlife of the Department of Interior;

          - The National Sea Grant Program from the National Science
          Foundation;

          - elements of the U.S. Lake Survey of the Department of the
          Army, and;

          - The Department of the Navy's National Oceanographic Data
          Center.

   The Commission urged that "Because of the importance of the seas to
   this Nation and the world, our Federal organization of marine affairs
   must be put in order." [2]

                           Reorganization Plan #4

   Immediately after publication of Our Nation and the Sea, Congress
   responded by beginning deliberations on the creation of the new agency.
   The concept was also incorporated into President Nixon's Advisory
   Council on Executive Organization. This Council, appointed in 1969 and
   chaired by Ray L. Ash (Litton Industries), made a series of
   recommendations on re-structuring the executive branch. One of those
   proposals was to replace the Department of Interior with a new
   Department of Natural Resources. One of the elements of the Department
   was to be a National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration which would
   combine some elements of the Department of Interior with the
   Environmental Science Services Administration (ESSA) of the Department
   of Commerce. Then Secretary of Commerce, Maurice Stans, noting that
   ESSA would comprise more than two-thirds of this new Agency (some
   10,000 employees and an estimated FY 1970 budget of approximately $200
   million) countered with a proposal to, at least initially, consolidate
   and house NOAA within Commerce and transfer it to the proposed
   Department of Natural Resources at a later date. [3] Prior to the
   Stans' proposal, the Administration had been considering housing an
   interim organization in the Department of Interior. The logic of
   Secretary Stans' recommendation, possibly combined with some political
   tensions between the White House and Interior Secretary Hickel, lead
   [Ed. led] to a decision in favor of Commerce. Deliberations within the
   Executive Branch finally resulted in Reorganization Plan No. 4 of 1970
   which was proposed in early July and became effective ninety days later
   in October 1970. President Nixon had concurred with Secretary Stans
   and, incorporating elements from the Stratton Commission Report, the
   Ash Council recommendations, and Congressional deliberations, proposed
   that the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration be created
   within the Department of Commerce.

                                    - 4 -

   Like the Stratton Commission Report, Reorganization Plan No. 4 proposed
   that the following programs be transferred to the new agency:

          - the Environmental Science Services Administration (ESSA) of
          the Department of Commerce;

          - most of the Bureau of Commercial Fisheries, and the marine
          sport fishing program of its Bureau of Sport Fisheries and
          Wildlife;

          - The Office of Sea Grant Programs from the National Science
          Foundation;

          - The mapping, charting and research functions of the Army's
          U.S. Lake Survey; and

          - The Navy's National Oceanographic Data Center.

   Reorganization Plan No. 4 did not implement the Stratton Commission's
   recommendation to include the Coast Guard in the new NOAA, but went
   beyond that Commission's proposed agency by also including:

          - The Marine Minerals Technology Center of Interior's Bureau of
          Mines;

          - The Navy's National Oceanographic Instrumentation Center; and

          - The National Data Buoy Project from Department of
          Transportation.

   In testimony before the House Committee on Government Operations,
   Secretary Stans described the creation of NOAA as an extension of the
   Department's historical science and technology programs:

     We already have in the Department the solid base of science and
     technology which will buttress the foundation of an exciting and
     vigorous NOAA...

     I believe that the new National Oceanic and Atmospheric
     Administration will enable this nation in the decades ahead to fully
     and wisely utilize and understand the oceans and the atmosphere.
     This new initiative ... will greatly enhance the quality of our
     environment, our security, our economy, and our ability to meet
     increased demands for food and raw materials. I regard the
     establishment of NOAA as an essential step forward. [4]

                               NOAA's Heritage

   In order to understand the consolidated agency, one must look first at
   the history and programs of its component organizations. In the case of
   NOAA, those histories are wide and varied and in one case, represent
   some of the oldest activities of the Department of Commerce -- dating
   back to 1807! The following sections will provide some insight into the
   major programs/organizations which, in October 1970, became NOAA.

                                    - 5 -

   Environmental Science Services Administration

   The Environmental Science Services Administration (ESSA), the largest
   single piece of the new NOAA, was itself the product of a
   reorganization plan. In Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1965, President
   Johnson proposed the consolidation of two long-standing agencies of the
   Department of Commerce -- the Coast and Geodetic Survey and the Weather
   Bureau. In addition, the new ESSA was to include the Central Radio
   Propagation Laboratory of the National Bureau of Standards. President
   Johnson's May 13, 1965 message to Congress noted that:

     The new Administration will then provide a single national focus for
     our efforts to describe, understand, and predict the state of the
     oceans, the state of the lower and upper atmosphere, and the size
     and shape of the earth.

   As described by President Johnson and, then Director of the Weather
   Bureau, Dr. Robert White, the creation of ESSA:

          - responded to an increasing national need for adequate warnings
          of severe natural hazards (e.g., tornadoes, hurricanes, floods);

          - responded to technological advances in capabilities to observe
          the physical environment and communicate and process
          environmental data; and

          - would enable scientists to investigate the physical
          environment as a "scientific whole" rather than a "collection of
          separate and distinct fields of scientific interest". [5]

   The creation of ESSA was the result of deliberations by a special
   committee established in May 1964 to review the environmental science
   service activities and responsibilities of the Department of Commerce.
   The committee, comprised of the heads of the National Bureau of
   Standards (NBS), the Weather Bureau, and the Coast and Geodetic Survey
   and supported by a panel of respected scientists from industry and
   academia, was established by Dr. Herbert Hollomon, Assistant Secretary
   of Commerce for Science and Technology and reflect [Ed. reflected] the
   Department's longstanding commitment to management efficiency, the
   effective provision of quality public services. [6]

   Coast and Geodetic Survey [7]

   Often referred to as the Nation's oldest scientific agency, the "Survey
   of the Coast" was established on February 10, 1807 by President Thomas
   Jefferson. The increasing importance of waterborne Commerce to the new
   Nation prompted Jefferson to sign legislation to "cause a survey to be
   taken of coasts of the United States." [8] Using officers detailed from
   the Navy (for the seagoing portion of charting) and from the Army
   Topographical Bureau, the "Survey" conducted its early activities under
   the U.S. Department of Treasury where it shared vessels with the
   Revenue Cutter Service, forerunner of the Coast Guard. The Survey has a
   rich and interesting history but, since the focus of this volume is
   recent Department history (post World War II), the early years will be
   represented by the following highlights of significant events:

                                    - 6 -

          o 1816 -- Ferdinand Hassler, first Superintendent of the Survey
          begins geodetic work to lay the foundation for accurate surveys.

          o 1818-1832 -- Survey of the Coast operations suspended; survey
          work performed by the Navy. During this period, Ferdinand
          Hassler became the first head of the newly created Office of
          Weights and Measures. This Office was incorporated in the Survey
          until, in the early 20th century, it became the National Bureau
          of Standards.

          o 1834 -- first hydrographic survey along the south shore of
          Long Island;

          o 1836-1838 -- the re-named "U.S. Coast Survey" conducts its
          first topographic surveys of the coasts of New York, New Jersey
          and Connecticut.

          o 1839 -- first nautical chart produced (Newark Bay).

          o 1840's -- introduction of the first automatic recording tide
          gage.

          o 1853 -- first issue of the Survey's "Tide Prediction Tables"
          published.

          o 1875 -- Survey began publishing "Coast Pilots" with critical
          navigation information that cannot be portrayed on charts.

          o 1878 -- Survey's name changed to "Coast and Geodetic Survey"
          to reflect the role of geodesy in the agency's work.

          o 1882 -- William Ferrel, a survey mathematician, built an
          analog tide predicting machine that could produce a curve of
          future tide motions (used by the Survey until 1914).

          o 1901 -- the Survey established a standard datum for the U.S.
          that provided a unified survey reference system for mapping and
          engineering work.

          o 1904 -- weighted wire-drag surveys introduced in hydrography
          to reveal the depth and position of submerged rocks and other
          obstructions.

          o 1907 -- Survey completed a line of geodetic levels across the
          continental U.S. which involved 33,000 miles of first-order
          levels and the establishment of 13,000 geodetic benchmarks.

          o 1914 -- Survey's Rollin A. Harris and E.G. Fischer develop a
          new tide predicting machine which traced a continuous curve
          showing tide levels for each day of the year and indicated the
          time and height of high and low water; this "technical marvel"
          remained the principal tide predicting device until 1966 when
          replaced by computers.

          o 1917 -- legislation formally creates a Commissioned Officers
          Corps to meet the Survey's need and expand the strength of the
          Navy and Marine Corps. Originally created as a specialized body
          of geodetic and hydrographic engineers, the NOAA Corps now
          includes biologists, meteorologists, oceanographers and other
          scientific disciplines. One of the Nation's seven uniformed
          services, this Corps of scientists and

                                    - 7 -

          engineers supports the activities of all elements of the Agency.
          [9] It is interesting to note that in1972, the NOAA Corps became
          the first of the U.S. uniformed services to recruit women on the
          same basis as men.

          o World War I -- Survey's ships and more than half of its
          personnel transferred to the Navy and Army to support the war
          effort.

          o 1926 -- Survey given responsibility for charting the Nation's
          airways and publishing aeronautical charts.

          o 1927 -- North American Datum established making it possible to
          connect all surveys and maps on a uniform base.

   World War II placed unprecedented demands on the services of the Coast
   and Geodetic Survey. During the war, nautical chart production
   increased 10-fold, and aeronautical chart production increased a
   phenomenal 25-fold. Again, more than half of the Survey's commissioned
   officers and many civilian employees served in the military. Also,
   three of the Survey's nine major ships were ordered into duty with the
   Navy. In fact, the Coast and Geodetic Survey ship Pathfinder narrowly
   survived a kamikaze hit in the Pacific and was ultimately scuttled at
   Bataan in 1942 after taking two hits in the Japanese attack against the
   Philippines.

   In the early 1950's, there was a growing awareness of the need for
   oceanographic exploration and new methods and equipment for marine
   research, as well as a growing realization of the importance of the
   world's ocean resources. The Coast and Geodetic Survey began to meet
   these new needs for oceanographic information by incorporating new
   advances in marine technology that grew out of developments made during
   World War II, such as electronic echo sounding equipment and
   positioning systems. These new systems did much to improve the speed
   and accuracy of the collection of hydrographic and oceanographic data.
   However, because the recording, processing, and plotting of survey data
   were still performed manually, the Survey's capacity to use the data
   fully was lagging behind the capability to collect the data. In the
   1960's the Survey began a program to develop a computer-assisted system
   for handling the massive amounts of hydrographic data that were being
   collected. In 1962, the Survey's Pacific Marine Center produced the
   first automatically processed and machine-plotted hydrographic smooth
   sheet -- the first step in the marriage of hydrography and automated
   data processing. Ultimately, this work culminated in the development of
   the Hydroplot System, which became the mainstay for the Survey's
   hydrographic survey operations. The system, which is only now facing
   obsolescence, is considered by many to be the first, and most
   practical, automated hydrographic survey system--and a major milestone
   in the history of hydrography.

   In the 1960's, the Survey's fleet of 14 ships was replaced with new,
   larger, and more sophisticated survey ships designed specifically for
   hydrographic and oceanographic work. In 1970, with the formation of the
   National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, the name of this new
   fleet of ships was changed to the NOAA Fleet. At the same time, the
   Coast and Geodetic Survey was renamed the National Ocean Survey, and
   the Lake Survey Center, which was responsible for surveying functions
   on the Great Lakes, was transferred from the U.S. Army Corps of
   Engineers to NOS. [10]

                                    - 8 -

   Weather Bureau [11]

   The second oldest element of what became the Environmental Science
   Services Administration was the Weather Bureau. 1991 will mark the
   100th anniversary of the civilian weather service which was created on
   July 1, 1891 when an Act of Congress transferred the weather bureau
   from the Army Signal Corps to the Department of Agriculture. This
   action was preceded however by nearly 250 years of weather observation
   and study in the U.S. Historians agree that the first continuous
   weather records in the U.S. were kept in 1644 and 1645 by the Reverend
   John Campanius Holm near Wilmington, Delaware. While many other
   individuals kept "weather diaries" from time to time around the
   country, the best known is probably Thomas Jefferson. Jefferson was
   considered a weather expert in his day and often responded to questions
   about American weather and climate. The War of 1812 brought the first
   government collection of weather observations. Responding to growing
   interest in the effect of weather on health, Dr. James Tilton, the
   Surgeon-General of the Army, ordered hospital surgeons to observe the
   weather and keep climatological records. The following highlights
   summarize the most significant events during the pre-World War II
   history of the Weather Bureau:

          o 1817 -- a system of weather observations at land offices
          established by Josiah Miegs, Commissioner-General of the Land
          Office.

          o 1825-1850 -- New York University and the State of Pennsylvania
          operate state networks of weather observations.

          o 1849 -- Professor Joseph Henry of the Smithsonian Institution
          establishes first extensive observation network by supplying
          weather instruments to telegraph companies. Dr. Henry prepared
          maps based on simultaneous observations sent to the Smithsonian
          by telegraph operators and often made predictions based on those
          maps -- the first published weather forecasts in the U.S. This
          network was severely disrupted by the Civil War.

          o 1865 -- Dr. Henry's annual report urges reorganization of all
          meteorological observations under a single agency as a means of
          predicting storms and warning coastal shipping.

          o 1869 -- a new weather observation network established by
          Cleveland Abbe, Director of the Cincinnati Observatory. Using
          some of the former Smithsonian observers, Professor Abbe issued
          forecasts which he called "probabilities."

          o 1870 -- An Act [Ed. Joint Resolution] of Congress (introduced
          in 1869 by Congressman H. E. Paine of Wisconsin) established a
          national weather warning service under the Secretary of War.
          Capitalizing on a widespread telegraph system and the interest
          of their head, Colonel A. J. Myer, the Army Signal Corps assumed
          responsibility for taking observations at military stations and
          warning of storms on the Great Lakes and the Atlantic and Gulf
          Coasts.

          o 1871 -- first daily weather maps appeared in January and
          weather predictions began to be published regularly in February.

                                    - 9 -

          o 1871 -- observing and reporting river stages added to the
          responsibilities of the Signal Corps.

          o 1871 -- Professor Abbe appointed as special assistant to the
          Chief Signal Officer and directed most of the Service's research
          on tornadoes, moisture in the air, atmospheric electricity, use
          of balloons, thermometer exposure, and wet-bulb temperature
          conversion tables.

          o 1874 -- remaining 383 cooperative observers in the
          Smithsonian's network transferred to the Signal Service.

          o 1884 -- weather services for cotton and sugar producers
          initiated.

          o 1885 -- Service began issuing warnings of Atlantic storms (in
          cooperation with the British Meteorological Office).

          o 1884 -- reduced appropriations forced the closure of 18
          stations of the Signal Service; due largely to a decrease in the
          prestige of the Service associated with the 1881 indictment of
          the service's disbursing officer (Captain Henry W. Howgate) for
          embezzlement.

          o 1890 -- the "Weather Service Organic Act" is passed,
          transferring the weather service to the new Department of
          Agriculture; transfer of operations officially accomplished on
          July 1, 1891.

          o 1891-1939 -- public forecasts issued twice a day for the
          ensuing 36 hours (based on twice daily observations).

          o 1896 -- first hurricane warning service established.

          o 1902 -- forecasts sent by wireless to ships at sea for the
          first time; in 1905, the first reports from ships at sea were
          received (primarily in support of hurricane warnings).

          o 1909 -- Bureau began a regular program of free balloon upper
          air observations.

          o 1910 -- Weather Bureau began issuing weekly forecasts.

          o 1913 -- first fire weather forecast issued.

          o 1914 -- aerological section established within the Bureau to
          meet the growing needs of aviation (services to aviation
          actually began in 1902 with a study of surface winds at Kitty
          Hawk for the Wright Brothers).

          o 1918 -- special bulletins and forecasts first issued for
          military aviation.

          o 1919 -- daily "flying weather" forecasts were begun for the
          Post Office Department and military aviation; the first flight
          forecast centers were established in 1920 in Chicago,
          Washington, and San Francisco.

          o 1922 -- special fruit frost service began in selected states.

                                   - 10 -

          o 1926 -- the Air Commerce Act of 1926 gives the Bureau
          responsibility for weather services to civilian aviation.

          o 1927 -- two Frenchmen attach a radio transmitter to a free
          balloon; a year later a Russian meteorologist (Moltchanoff)
          achieved the first official flight of a "radio meteorograph"
          attached to a sounding balloon -- this eventually led to the
          familiar radiosondes (or "weather balloon").

          o 1928 -- first teletypewriter circuits installed, which
          eliminated the Bureau's dependence on telephone and telegraph.

          o 1934 -- Bureau began machine processing of past weather
          records with the establishment of a tabulating unit in New
          Orleans; the Bureau began card punching surface and upper air
          data from airway weather stations in 1936; in 1951, these
          activities were moved to Asheville, North Carolina with the
          establishment of the National Weather Records Center.

          o 1935 -- improved hurricane warning service established.

          o 1936 -- Weather Bureau began operational use of radiosondes
          which allowed for the routine measurement of atmospheric
          pressure, temperature, humidity, wind direction and speed.

          o 1939 -- automatic telephone weather forecast service began.

          o 1940 -- first official five-day forecast issued.

   Also in 1940, the Weather Bureau was transferred to the Department of
   Commerce. President Roosevelt's explanation for this reorganization
   noted that the move would "permit better coordination of Government
   activities relating to aviation and to commerce generally..."

   In fact during and after World War II, the tremendous growth of the
   Weather Bureau was due largely to the expansion of aviation. Increasing
   performance capabilities of aircraft required improved observing and
   reporting networks, communications systems and forecasting
   organization. After World War II, surplus radars were acquired by the
   Bureau to track the movement of rain areas, storms and squall lines. In
   1942, building on early work on the use of computers for weather
   prediction, (which the Weather Bureau, the Air Weather Service and the
   Naval Weather Service supported at the Institute for Advanced Study in
   Princeton, New Jersey, MIT, and the University of Chicago), a central
   Analysis Center was created to prepare and distribute master analyses
   of the upper atmosphere. The Joint Numerical Weather Prediction Unit
   was established in the Center in 1954 and by 1985, operational computer
   weather forecasts had become routine. In 1958, this Center became part
   of the National Meteorological Center which provides guidance to the
   field stations by preparing weather analyses and forecasts for the
   Northern Hemisphere. In 1948, the teletypewriter was supplemented by
   facsimile transmission -- a wirephoto technique used to transmit
   analyzed maps and charts from analysis centers to field weather
   stations. In 1954, automatic observing stations, which made weather
   measurements and transmitted them by teletypewriter, were first placed
   in operation. Also during that year, the Bureau began the installation
   of high-powered radars along the coastline to detect and track

                                   - 11 -

   hurricanes. The Bureau began an ongoing study of hurricanes in 1956
   with the establishment of the National Hurricane Research Project. In a
   similar effort to improve forecasts of inland severe storms, the
   Weather Bureau established a severe storm forecast center in 1952.
   While Signal Corps officers had attempted to predict the occurrence of
   tornadoes, early Weather Bureau forecasters were not permitted to issue
   tornado forecasts for fear of causing panic. The ability to make
   accurate forecasts of severe storms was only made possible with the
   development of modern methods of upper air observation and air-mass
   analysis.

   Perhaps the most exciting developments in recent Weather Service
   history can be traced to April 1960 when NASA launched the first
   weather satellite. The polar-orbiting [Ed. inclined orbit] TIROS-1
   (Television lnfra-Red Observation Satellite) built by RCA, provided
   forecasters with the first view of cloud (i.e., weather) patterns as
   they developed and moved across the continent. The history of weather
   satellites like TIROS actually trace their history back to the 1950's
   when scientists like the Weather Bureau's Dr. Harry Wexler began to
   push for the development of satellites for weather studies and
   measurements. Dr. Wexler's 1954 paper "Observing the Weather from a
   Satellite Vehicle" remains a classic in the field. [12] The mid-late
   1950's saw the development and testing of a number of
   military-sponsored satellite systems for weather observations. Prior to
   1958, these experiments were part of broader satellite experimentation.
   In 1958, however, the Defense Department began a program to develop a
   spacecraft specifically for meteorological purposes. This "TIROS"
   program was transferred to NASA in April 1959.

   In 1961, the Weather Bureau, along with colleagues in the military,
   NASA and the private sector, formally undertook the development and
   operation of a global weather satellite observing system. Additional
   polar-orbiting TIROS research satellites were launched over the next
   several years to test new camera lenses and transmission techniques.
   TIROS-8, launched in late 1963 successfully tested an automatic picture
   transmission (APT) system which continually relayed imagery to ground
   receiving stations anywhere in the world along the satellite's track.

   The TIROS-9 satellite, launched into sun-synchronous, near polar-orbit
   in 1965, gave the first complete daily coverage of the entire
   sun-illuminated portion of the earth. Launched just a few months
   earlier, the NIMBUS-1 satellite carried an infrared sensor which
   permitted the first-ever nighttime pictures from space. The early TIROS
   spacecraft and NIMBUS-1 proved the feasibility of an operational system
   of weather-watching satellites. On July 1, 1965, TIROS-10, the first
   wholly operational meteorological satellite was launched. The more
   recent history of the Department of Commerce's weather satellite
   program will be discussed in later sections describing the activities
   of ESSA and NOAA.

   Central Radio Propagation Laboratory [13]

   The third major component of the newly-created ESSA was the Central
   Radio Propagation Laboratory. This Laboratory, located in Boulder,
   Colorado, was established in 1946 as the central Federal agency for
   obtaining and disseminating information on the propagation of
   electromagnetic waves, on the electromagnetic properties of man's
   environment, on the nature of electromagnetic noise and interference,
   and on methods for more efficient use

                                   - 12 -

   of the electromagnetic spectrum for telecommunication purposes. The
   Ionospheric Telecommunications Division of the Laboratory played a key
   role in the discovery of new models of electromagnetic propagation by
   the ionosphere and the practical use of such new telecommunication
   techniques. The Division was responsible for publishing a regular
   "radio weather" forecast series which predicted the best frequencies
   for ionospheric radio transmissions.

   The Tropospheric Telecommunications Division conducted similar research
   related to telecommunication activities within the area from the
   earth's surface up to 5 or 10 miles. Research included the effects of
   weather and terrain on television and microwave frequencies as well as
   investigations of the propagation of infrared, optical and radio
   frequencies.

   The Space Environment Forecasting Division focused its research on the
   effects of solar disturbances and how to predict them. This effort was
   a natural outgrowth of research on techniques to measure changes in the
   ionosphere which affect radio transmissions. Since most of such changes
   are the result of solar-associated disturbances, many of the same
   techniques could be used to study the nature of the disturbances
   themselves. Such investigations were critical to support for manned and
   unmanned space flights.

   The Aeronomy Division of CRPL conducted research aimed at understanding
   the fundamental physical processes controlling the ionosphere. Focusing
   on gaining a detailed knowledge of the characteristics of the upper
   atmosphere, the activities of the Division were critical to supporting
   the Nation's increased space and satellite programs.

                                   - 13 -

                          NOAA -- AT IT'S CREATION

   The Environmental Science Services Administration [14]

   Within its first year of existence, ESSA had made significant progress
   toward its task to describe, understand and predict the state of the
   oceans, the state of the upper and lower atmosphere, and the size and
   shape of the earth. [15] Building on the capabilities of the Central
   Radio Propagation Laboratory, the Institutes for Environmental Research
   were established in Boulder, Colorado. This represented a revolutionary
   organizational concept which would continue throughout the history of
   ESSA and NOAA -- the concept of unified mission support for the
   Agency's program objectives through environmental science and
   technology development. In all, four Institutes were organized:

          o The Institute for Telecommunications Sciences and Aeronomy --
          formed largely of personnel from the old Central Radio
          Propagation Laboratory and the Geoacoustics Group of the
          National Bureau of Standards.

          o The Institute for Earth Sciences composed of staff from the
          Research Division of the Coast and Geodetic Survey.

          o The Institute for Oceanography also composed of C&GS
          personnel.

          o The Institute for Atmospheric Sciences staffed largely by
          meteorologists and other staff from the Weather Bureau's Office
          of Meteorological Research.

          In 1967, the institutes became the ESSA Research Laboratories.
          The Laboratories, eleven in all, plus one unit still identified
          as an Institute for Telecommunications Science, and the Research
          Flight Facility, were the result of a re-structuring designed to
          more precisely reflect the scope and mission of the individual
          elements. The eleven laboratories included:

                - The Earth Sciences Laboratory

                - The Atlantic Oceanographic Laboratory

                - The Pacific Oceanographic Laboratory

                - The Atmospheric Physics and Chemistry Laboratory

                - The Air Resources Laboratory

                - The Geophysical Fluid Dynamics Laboratory

                - The National Hurricane Research Laboratory

                - The National Severe Storms Laboratory

                - The Space Disturbances Laboratory

                - The Aeronomy Laboratory and

                - The Wave Propagation Laboratory.

          The National Weather Records Center (established in Asheville,
          North Carolina in 1951) gave rise to an Environmental Data
          Center complex with the transfer of the Geodetic and Seismology
          Data Centers [Ed. Coast and Geodetic Survey Seismology Data
          Centers] to Asheville in 1966. In many ways, this move and the
          reorganization of the ESSA laboratories reflect the history of
          the entire organization during its five years of independent
          existence. It was a period of "settling in" and "settling down"
          to the task of addressing an enormous mission -- understanding
          the global environment.

   - 14 -

          Much of the excitement associated with that job during the ESSA
          years involved the beginnings of the operational weather
          satellite program. During the early years of meteorological
          satellites, scientists recognized the potential value of a
          geostationary orbit to provide continuous viewing of weather
          systems over the U.S. It wasn't until the mid-60's, however,
          that sufficient rocket power became available to achieve a
          geostationary orbit. 1966 saw the launch of a NASA operational
          experiment with early imaging and weather broadcast systems
          aboard. Joint NASA/ESSA (later NOAA) experimentation would
          continue until 1974 and 1975 when geostationary weather
          satellites became an operational reality with the launch of
          NASA's Synchronous Meteorological Satellites (SMS) 1, 2. These
          satellites were the prototype for what is now NOAA's
          Geostationary Operational Environmental Satellites (GOES) -- the
          so-called "hurricane-tracking" satellites whose images are so
          familiar to all of us who watch the nightly news on television.

          Now let's take a look at the other programs and organizations
          which were combined with ESSA in 1980 to create the National
          Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA).

          Bureau of Commercial Fisheries [16]

          Like the Weather Bureau and the Coast and Geodetic Survey, the
          Bureau of Commercial Fisheries (BCF) has historical roots that
          date back to the 19th century. In 1871, President Ulysses S.
          Grant signed legislation establishing a one-man, U.S. Fish
          Commission charged to:

     ascertain whether any and what diminution of food fishes of the
     coasts and lakes of the United States has taken place; and, if so,
     to what causes the same is due; and also whether any and what
     protective, prohibitory or precautionary measures should be
     adopted... (and) report upon the same to Congress.

          Thus began the Federal interest in and commitment to the
          conservation of living marine resources; a commitment and a
          responsibility that is largely the same today.

          In 1903 the Fish Commission became the Bureau of Fisheries in
          the new Department of Commerce and Labor. The Bureau remained in
          Commerce until 1939 when it was transferred to the Interior
          Department. One year later, the Bureau was consolidated with the
          Department of Agriculture's Bureau of Biological Survey and
          became the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service. With passage of the
          Fish and Wildlife Act of 1956, the Bureau of Commercial
          Fisheries (BCF) became a separate Bureau in the Department of
          Interior. The organization created by this law remained largely
          unchanged until 1970 when, as part of Reorganization Plan No. 4,
          most of its functions were transferred to NOAA and the Bureau's
          Pesticides Laboratory in Gulf Breeze, Florida was transferred to
          the new Environmental Protection Agency.

          Like its predecessor organizations, the BCF brought to NOAA a
          responsibility for developing and managing programs to define
          and identify solutions to the problems of commercial fisheries.
          It is important to note that this was essentially a scientific
          responsibility designed to foster conservation -- the wise use
          of marine resources. Specific management and conservation
          responsibilities would not be given to what is now the National
          Marine

   - 15 -

          Fisheries Service until the mid-1970's. Thus what the Bureau
          brought to the new Agency was largely a program of biological
          research designed to provide an understanding of the nature,
          size, behavior, and, most importantly, maximum sustainable yield
          of commercially-important fish stocks and marine mammals off the
          coasts of the U.S. Complementing this fundamental research
          program were Bureau activities designed to assist industry,
          ensure consumer safety and support U.S. responsibilities under
          international treaties and agreements. The Bureau conducted
          resource assessment surveys; maintained a national program of
          fishery statistics and market news; supported gear development
          and evaluation studies as well as fishery development research
          designed to find alternative uses for underutilized fish and
          shellfish populations; conducted a voluntary grading and
          inspection program -- paid for by the processor; and maintained
          a staff of marketing specialists and economists who provided
          services to Federal and state Governments, industry, and
          consumer organizations. All of these responsibilities and
          activities came to NOAA and, in large part, are still part of
          the Agency's marine fisheries programs.

          The Bureau of Commercial Fisheries also brought to the new
          Agency a number of specialized facilities across the country.
          These included five regional offices in Seattle, Washington; St.
          Petersburg, Florida; Gloucester, Massachusettes; Juneau, Alaska;
          and Terminal Island, California; nearly 30 major laboratories
          and research centers and nearly 50 smaller installations and
          offices such as statistics and market news offices. The new
          Agency's fleet of Coast and Geodetic Survey ships was also
          significantly expanded by the addition of twenty-five research
          vessels ranging from 40-footers to the 214-foot MILLER FREEMAN.
          Many of these vessels are still in operation today.

          Marine Sport Fishery Program [17]

          The creation of NOAA also involved another element of the
          Department of Interior's fishery programs -- the marine game
          fish research program of the Bureau of Sport Fisheries and
          Wildlife. Authorized in 1959 by P.L. 86-359, "A Study of
          Migratory Game Fish", this program represented much of the
          Interior Department's marine and estuarine research. Like the
          Bureau of Commercial Fisheries, this program brought significant
          scientific capability to the new Agency. The Sandy Hook Marine
          Laboratory, built in 1960, represented a cadre of fishery
          biologists, conducting research primarily focused on the
          dependence of certain marine species on the near-shore and
          estuarine environments. At the time NOAA was created, the Sandy
          Hook Laboratory had recently begun a research program on the
          effect of waste disposal on the marine environment --
          particularly in the New York Bight, and related investigations
          of marine fish diseases and their relationship to sewage and
          other waste effluents.

          The Tiburon Marine Laboratory was established in 1962 in several
          buildings at the former naval base at Tiburon, California. In
          collaboration with scientists from the Sandy Hook Laboratory,
          researchers at Tiburon were early pioneers in the use of
          airborne infrared sensing devices to measure sea surface
          temperature -- an oceanographic parameter relevant to
          productivity and often used to locate fish stocks. Most of the
          Tiburon Laboratory's activities were focused on research on the
          ecology of shore and reef fish and studies of billfish stocks
          (e.g., marlin and sailfish), including a major tagging program
          conducted in cooperation with the Mexican Government and
          industry associations.

   - 16 -

          The third facility which this consolidation brought to the new
          NOAA was the Narragansett Marine Game Fish Laboratory in Rhode
          Island. Established in 1966, this Laboratory conducted research
          on big game sharks, the differentiation of races among game
          fish, experimental aquaculture, and marine game fish statistics.
          At the time of Reorganization Plan No. 4, scientists at the
          Narragansett facility were planning to begin broad studies of
          the impact of environmental factors like currents, temperature
          and plankton abundance on Atlantic coast game fish and to
          establish the Laboratory as a center for estuarine research in
          cold waters.

          While a permanent facility was still under construction at the
          time of the transfer, scientists at the Eastern Gulf Marine
          Laboratory's temporary facilities in Panama City, Florida were
          conducting research on estuarine and onshore ecology in the
          South Atlantic and Gulf regions.

          Office of Sea Grant Programs [18]

          In October 1966, the President signed P.L. 89-688, the National
          Sea Grant Colleges and Programs Act to:

                - provide for increased utilization of marine resources,
                including animal and vegetable life and mineral wealth in
                United States offshore waters, including the Great Lakes;

                - develop skilled manpower, including engineers and
                technicians, and the equipment necessary to use these
                untapped resources; and

                - provide greater economic opportunities -- including
                expanded commerce and employment -- for the enjoyment and
                use of the Nation's marine resources.

          Responsibility for the program was assigned to the National
          Science Foundation which provided support for two types of Sea
          Grant activities. "Institutional support" was provided to major
          institutions engaged in comprehensive marine resource programs,
          including research, education, and advisory services. By 1970,
          nine universities had received Sea Grant Institutional support:
          Hawaii, Miami, Michigan, Oregon State, Rhode Island, Texas A&M,
          Washington, Wisconsin, and the University of Southern
          California. One of the most unique characteristics of the
          programs at these institutions was their multidisciplinary,
          interdepartmental approach to solving ocean and coastal resource
          problems. In addition, Sea Grant provided "project support" for
          individual research efforts in marine resource development at
          colleges and universities across the country.

          Sea Grant support was contingent upon matching funds from
          non-Federal sources and this aspect of the program had, by 1970,
          helped entrain over 30 industries and a half dozen state
          Governments to participate in ocean science and technology
          programs.

   - 17 -

          As the name implies, the Sea Grant program was, in many ways,
          designed to provide an ocean resource counterpart to the Land
          Grant College Program. The most obvious analog was the
          establishment of marine extension services similar to
          long-established agriculture extension services. Also like the
          Land Grant Program, Sea Grant was actively involved in the
          support of undergraduate and graduate education of engineers and
          the training of hundreds of technicians at the two-year college
          level.

          At the time of NOAA's creation, the Sea Grant program was
          undergoing a period of rapid growth. Funding for the program
          during its first four years had grown from $5 million in 1968
          (although authorized in 1966, specific funding for the program
          was not provided until 1968) to $9 million in 1970 and the
          President's budget for fiscal year 1971 proposed a budget of $13
          million.

          United States Lake Survey [19]

          The incorporation of the United States Lake Survey into NOAA
          brought another organization with a long and colorful history to
          the Department of Commerce. This Survey's activities began on
          March 31, 1841 when, in an effort to support westward expansion,
          an Act of Congress provided $15,000 for a "hydrographical survey
          of the Northern and Northwestern Lakes." To do the job, the Lake
          Survey was created within the U.S. Army Topographical Engineers
          which was later merged into the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers.
          Like the Commerce Department's Coast and Geodetic Survey, the
          Lake Survey had responsibility for the preparation and
          publication of nautical charts and other navigational aids.

          The Survey, housed in Detroit, Michigan, published its first
          charts in 1852 -- covering all of Lake Erie. By 1882, the Survey
          had completed the original Congressional mandate, producing some
          76 charts. The original Survey was then disbanded. By 1901,
          however, it became clear that the original survey and charting
          products required revision. For example, since the deepest draft
          vessels used in the Great Lakes in the mid-late 1800's drew only
          12 feet of water, the Survey's charts only showed depths of 18
          feet or less! By the early 1960's, deeper draft vessels were in
          use which required additional information on waters of the Great
          Lakes. So, the Lake Survey was reconstituted and its mission
          expanded to include responsibility for lakes and navigable
          waters of the New York State Barge Canal System, Lake Champlain
          and the Minnesota-Ontario Border Lakes. In addition to
          traditional survey, charting, and navigation information
          responsibilities, the Lake Survey also brought to NOAA
          responsibilities for studies on lake levels and associated river
          flow. Originally initiated to support navigational needs, the
          stream measuring stations and Survey's water level and
          precipitation gages enabled engineers to make six-month
          forecasts of lake levels and build a data base dating back to
          1860 which supported the needs of public planning agencies and
          private sector interests like construction firms.

          The Survey greatly expanded this effort in 1962 with the
          establishment of the Great Lakes Research Center. At the time of
          NOAA's creation, the Center was conducting strong programs in
          coastal engineering (water motion, including tides, currents,
          waves, seiches, and shore processes, like sedimentation) and
          water resources (water quality, water quantity and ice and snow
          conditions).

   - 18 -

          This work was supported by a suite of facilities including: the
          Great Lakes Regional Data Center, a Technical Library and
          Instrument Office, an Ice and Snow Laboratory, a Chemical
          Laboratory, and a Sedimentation Laboratory. The Lake Survey
          brought all of these capabilities into the new NOAA.

          National Data Buoy Project [20]

          In December 1967, the United States Coast Guard established the
          National Data Buoy Development Project to develop a national
          system of automatic ocean buoys to gather oceanic and
          atmospheric data. By the 1960's, scientists had recognized the
          need for more detailed information on environmental conditions
          over vast marine areas which remained largely uncovered except
          for occasional observations from ships or aircraft of
          opportunity, oceanographic research expeditions, or the few
          existing ocean station vessels. As a result, a number of Federal
          agencies and universities began programs to develop and
          implement networks of buoys which could routinely and
          automatically report environmental conditions like temperature,
          wind speed and direction, etc. Unfortunately, these disparate
          efforts were largely designed to meet individual agency or
          research needs.

          In 1966, the Panel on Ocean Engineering of the Interagency
          Committee on Oceanography, convened a group of Federal agency
          representatives to address the problems and possibilities
          associated with automated data buoy networks. This group
          recommended a national system of ocean data buoys and the
          Committee asked the Coast Guard to conduct a feasibility study.
          After ten months of work, the study report made the following
          conclusions:

                - extensive requirements exist for oceanographic and
                meteorological information to satisfy both operational and
                research needs in the oceanic and Great Lakes
                environments;

                - automatic, moored buoys were capable of meeting a
                significant portion of those needs; and that

                - a network of such buoys, would be an essential element
                of an overall environmental information and prediction
                system. [13]

          The National Council for Marine Resources and Engineering
          Development (established by the same law which created the
          Stratton Commission) took these conclusions seriously and in
          November 1967, asked the Coast Guard to accept lead agency
          responsibility for the research, development, testing and
          evaluation required to support future decisions on national data
          buoy systems. The National Data Buoy Development Project was
          established to do the job. The Project Office drew on existing
          capabilities in a number of disciplines from oceanography to
          communications and began an effort to develop a single, national
          system capable of providing key observations required to
          describe conditions in the marine environment (including the
          Great Lakes). Reorganization Plan No. 4 brought this
          responsibility and challenge to NOAA.

   - 19 -

          National Oceanographic Data Center [21]

          The National Oceanographic Data Center (NODC) was established by
          the Department of the Navy in 1960 to aggregate and disseminate
          the oceanographic data being collected by all Federal agencies.
          Although established by the Navy, NODC was actually sponsored by
          the ten agencies with interests in the marine environment: the
          Atomic Energy Commission; Bureau of Commercial Fisheries; Coast
          Guard; Coastal Engineering Research Center; the Department of
          the Navy; ESSA; the Federal Water Quality Administration; the
          Geological Survey; the Department of Health, Education and
          Welfare; and the National Science Foundation. Policy and
          technical direction for NODC was provided by an advisory body of
          representatives from those agencies and the National Academy of
          Sciences. Established to provide a mechanism to process,
          exchange and store global data from Government, industry,
          academic and research organizations, NODC brought to NOAA the
          world's largest useable collection of oceanographic data. Using
          data received from national and international sources (including
          a network of liaison offices in key regions of the country),
          NODC provided a variety of services including: data processing;
          data reproduction; analyses and preparation of statistical
          summaries; and data record evaluation on a cost reimbursable
          basis. The addition of NODC to the ESSA Environmental Data
          Centers provided the new NOAA with the key components of what
          would become the Nation's premier environmental data service.

          National Oceanographic Instrumentation Center [22]

          Like NODC, the National Oceanographic Instrumentation Center was
          originally a part of the Department of the Navy. Located in
          Washington, D.C. the office was established to provide a central
          Federal service for the calibration and testing of oceanographic
          instruments. The Instrumentation Center collaborated closely
          with NODC and the National Bureau of Standards to ensure
          adequate technique and reference standards for oceanographic
          instrumentation. At the time of NOAA's creation, the Center was
          responsible for a wide variety of oceanographic instrument
          development work including:

                - operation of an instrument evaluation laboratory;

                - maintenance of a central proposal and specifications
                file and information service;

                - cooperative programs with other Government agencies,
                academia and industry to support the development of
                standards;

                - laboratory, field testing and calibration of
                oceanographic instruments;

                - maintenance of instrument performance and deterioration
                records; and

                - a small in-house program of ocean instrumentation
                development.

   - 20 -

          Marine Minerals Technology Center [23]

          During the late fifties and sixties, scientists (both in
          industry and Government) had begun to seriously investigate the
          possibility of funding ocean-based alternatives to land-based
          sources of strategic minerals. Dry-land deposits of such
          minerals were already showing signs of depletion. Scientists
          were aware that the seafloor contained potentially recoverable
          deposits of materials rich in such strategic minerals as nickel,
          cobalt, copper, manganese, gold, tin, platinum, iron, titanium,
          and chromium. Of particular interest at the time of NOAA's
          creation were deep seabed deposits of manganese nodules which
          would, during the seventies and eighties, become the center of
          substantial debate both in the U.S. Congress and in the
          international Law of the Sea Treaty negotiations.

          By 1970, industry had already adapted land extraction techniques
          to develop ocean minerals like oil, gas, sulfur, sand, and
          gravel valued at over $2 billion. Industry was already,
          similarly, involved in commercial dredging of oyster shells and
          the extraction of chemicals and salts from sea water. Many of
          these activities, and the anticipated open ocean mining
          associated with recovery of deposits like manganese nodules,
          carried potentially significant environmental impacts (e. g.,
          oil spills, sedimentation, and increased turbidity which could
          disrupt biological productivity).

          The Department of Interior had responded to the challenge of
          increased ocean mineral development by establishing the Marine
          Minerals Technology Center in Tiburon, California. The Center,
          part of the Bureau of Mines, had two principal objectives:

                - assuring that any ocean mining systems ultimately
                developed would minimize damage to the marine environment;
                and

                - providing the tools and techniques required to
                accurately delineate marine mineral deposits.

          By the time of NOAA's creation, the Center was already
          conducting a number of cooperative programs with embryonic ocean
          mining industry groups to evaluate a number of specific new
          mining techniques including new drilling technologies. At the
          same time, the Center's marine resource investigations were
          beginning to build the scientific and environmental impact
          knowledge base on which future legislative and regulatory
          actions would be based -- including the issuance of exploration
          licenses for manganese nodule mining which has been a NOAA
          responsibility since 1980.

          With these rich, diverse and extensive capabilities now in
          place, this new agency called NOAA was ready to address the
          challenges expressed in President Nixon's reorganization
          statement including the exercise of "leadership in developing a
          national oceanic and atmospheric program of research and
          development."

   - 21 -
   NOAA - THE FIRST TEN YEARS

          The first ten years of NOAA's existence was a period of
          substantial growth and expansion -- a period which confirmed
          both the need for and benefits of an agency designed to improve
          our understanding of the earth system and its ocean and coastal
          resources. The Seventies saw the addition of numerous new
          programmatic responsibilities, largely the result of new
          legislation, which identified NOAA's role in national efforts to
          protect and conserve our environmental resources. These were
          years of intense environmental activity and NOAA's
          responsibilities were, in many cases, both obvious and
          essential.

          A look at the Agency's budget over the first ten years provides
          a sense of the magnitude of the change this period brought. In
          1971, NOAA activities were funded at nearly $300 million. By
          1981, the Agency was fulfilling responsibilities requiring a
          close to $900 million budget. The Nation and NOAA were investing
          in a future that demanded a better understanding of how the
          oceanic and atmospheric systems defined the nature of the
          environment in which we lived and the resources on which we
          depended. The following chapter will highlight some of the more
          significant events in the first ten years of NOAA's life.

   Organization

          The primary task for NOAA's first Administrator was, of course,
          to design a management structure which would effectively
          coalesce the numerous, disparate programs and offices which were
          to make up this new Agency. By January 1971, an interim
          organization had been established around the following six major
          programmatic components.

                o The National Marine Fisheries Service (managed through
                five regional offices);

                o The Environmental Research Laboratories (composed of ten
                facilities across the country);

                o The National Weather Service (managed through six
                regional offices);

                o The Environmental Data Center (composed of the National
                Oceanographic Data Center, the National Climatic Center,
                and the National Geophysical Data Center);

                o The National Ocean Survey (with Atlantic and Pacific
                Marine Centers, the Lake Survey Centers, and a number of
                seismology and geomagnetic stations and centers which
                supported NOAA's geodetic [Ed. geophysical]
                responsibilities); and

                o The National Environmental Satellite Service
                (responsible for the Nation's operational weather
                satellites).

   - 22 -

          In addition, the Administrator was supported by five line
          offices responsible for:

                o The NOAA Corps

                o The National Sea Grant College Program;

                o Environmental Systems (including the Data Buoy Project
                office, the Marine Minerals Technology Center, and the
                National Oceanographic Instrumentation Center);

                o program planning; and

                o administration and technical services.

          Thus organized, NOAA was ready to begin the challenges facing a
          new Agency. As you might expect, this new Agency, with its
          numerous specific responsibilities, would undergo several
          reorganizations during its formative years. In some cases,
          organizational changes were associated with the enactment of
          legislation (e.g., the creation of a line organization for
          Coastal Zone Management); in other cases, organizational moves
          were made to combine related activities and improve management
          efficiency. Each of these reorganizations reflected NOAA's
          growth and maturity as an Agency. As our understanding of the
          earth system and its resources has grown, we have refined the
          management structure for the agency's related science and
          service responsibilities. Now let's look at some of the more
          significant moments, in NOAA's early history.

   Fisheries

          The fishery resource activities of NOAA, and the Nation, took a
          dramatic turn in 1976. Often referred to as the most significant
          piece of fishery legislation in the history of the United
          States, the Magnuson Fishery Conservation and Management Act
          (MFCMA) established an innovative new management regime for U.S.
          commercial and recreational fish stocks within 200 miles of our
          coast. [24] Congress enacted the MFCMA in response to declines
          in U.S. commercial landings and dramatic increases in foreign
          catches off our coasts -- an area which supports 15-20% of the
          world's traditionally harvested fish resources. [25] The MFCMA
          established an exclusive U.S. Fishery Conservation Zone (between
          3 and 200 miles off our coast) and charged the Department of
          Commerce/NOAA with responsibility for implementing the unique,
          new management system authorized by the Act. Regional Fishery
          Management Councils were established to prepare management plans
          for each major fishery. These management plans must take into
          account social and economic as well as biological and
          environmental factors affecting each fishery; and identify
          specific management objectives and the management measures
          required to achieve those objectives. The MFCMA charged the
          Secretary of Commerce, acting through NOAA, with responsibility
          for approving and implementing these Fishery Management Plans
          (FMP's) and, along with the Coast Guard, enforcing the
          associated fishery regulations. Thus, in 1976, NOAA and the
          Department of Commerce acquired specific management
          responsibilities in addition to the more traditional research
          and information collection activities required to provide the
          scientific underpinning for effective industry and management
          decisions. This legislation, and the dramatic new
          responsibilities it brought, have dominated the nature and focus
          of most of NOAA's fisheries programs.

   - 23 -

          In addition to "management and conservation," the MFCMA carries
          with it a charge to enhance the "development" of domestic U.S.
          fisheries. In many cases, this involves the increased
          utilization of species not traditionally harvested by U.S.
          fishermen. NOAA responded to this charge in the late 1970's by
          significantly enhancing their work with other Federal agencies,
          state and local governments, industry and consumers to develop
          such "underutilized" species. This effort has involved, among
          other activities:

                o continued research on seafood product quality and
                safety;

                o the provision of information on domestic and
                international market conditions;

                o collaborative efforts with the State Department to
                remove barriers to U.S. exports; and

                o support for the development of new technologies.

          Since the late seventies, NOAA and the Department of Commerce
          have remained committed to an appropriate partnership with
          industry and the States in the development of U.S. fishery
          resources.

          The era of heightened environmental awareness which
          characterized the 1970's brought with it a greater understanding
          of the critical role that coastal and estuarine habitats play in
          the life support system of many commercially important fish
          stocks.


          Accordingly, the seventies saw the establishment of a strong
          "habitat protection" program in NOAA. The nature of NOAA's
          activities in this area has largely been determined by statutory
          requirements for NOAA analyses and comments on the environmental
          impacts of federal activities including: Environmental Impact
          Statement requirements of the National Environmental Protection
          Act, construction projects by the Army Corps of Engineers;
          dredge and fill permits associated with coastal development; and
          waste discharge permits under the Clean Water Act. Fulfilling
          these requirements involved the development and maintenance of
          strong NOAA research programs on the habitat requirements of
          important species and consistent monitoring of the quality of
          the marine environment.

   Marine Mammals and Endangered Species

          With enactment of the Marine Mammal Protection Act (1972) and
          the Endangered Species Act (1973), NOAA was given specific
          responsibility for the conservation of marine mammals and
          endangered marine species. The Marine Mammal Protection Act
          charged the Department of Commerce/NOAA with federal functions
          required to ensure the protection of marine mammals and imposed
          a U.S. moratorium on the taking and importation of marine
          mammals. The NOAA Administrator serves as the U.S.
          representative to the International Whaling Commission and over
          the years has made significant progress in developing and
          implementing substantial reductions in worldwide whaling
          activities.

   - 24 -

          The Endangered Species Act charged the Departments of
          Commerce/NOAA and Interior with responsibility for the
          conservation, protection and propagation of species and
          subspecies of fish and wildlife that are presently threatened
          with extinction, which are endangered, or are likely to become
          endangered.

          With enactment of the legislation in 1973, NOAA became
          responsible for most marine species of mammals and fish,
          reptiles, and invertebrates. Administering these
          responsibilities required the development and implementation of
          both: control measures (e.g., surveillance to stop illegal
          imports and exports of marine mammals and endangered species and
          regulation of the incidental take of marine mammals like
          porpoises in commercial fisheries); and strong supporting
          research programs. Since 1973, significant activities in this
          area have included:

                o administration of the Pribilof Islands in the Bering Sea
                -- a special reservation for the conservation and
                management of a herd of North Pacific fur seals under a
                four-nation agreement supervised by the United States;

                o major improvements in our understanding of the life
                history and behavior of sea turtles and cooperative
                efforts with industry to develop a "turtle excluder
                device" to help protect sea turtles from fish trawls;

                o a collaborative effort with industry to design and
                implement an escape device which allows fishermen to
                rescue porpoises caught in tuna nets; and

                o substantial improvements in our understanding of the
                nature and current status of whale stocks worldwide.

   Ocean and Coastal Resources

          In 1972, Congress recognized a pressing need to conserve the
          Nation's coastal lands and shorelines and passed the Coastal
          Zone Management Act (CZMA). With the President's signature, this
          Act established a significant partnership between the Federal
          Government and coastal states -- a partnership which recognized
          joint responsibility for a program to ensure the wise use of
          coastal resources.

          Responsibility for the Federal share of this partnership was
          assigned to NOAA. Under the CZMA, states were encouraged to
          develop individual management plans for their coastal zones. The
          Federal Government, through NOAA, was to establish general
          guidelines for such plans and provide financial and technical
          assistance to the states as they developed and began
          implementing the resulting coastal zone management programs.
          Planning grants were provided to states through 1979. Once a
          plan was approved, the Act authorized NOAA to provide direct
          financial support, also in the form of grants, to assist states
          in administering their new programs. By 1979, all thirty coastal
          states and four of the five eligible territories had
          participated in the program and coastal programs in 19 states,
          covering 68% of the Nation's shoreline, had received Federal
          approval. [27] By 1986, ninety percent of the U.S. coastline
          would be covered by approved Federal plans in twenty-nine states
          and territories. Federal responsibility to encourage
          participation in this voluntary program has been successfully
          pursued.

   - 25 -

          In addition to direct financial assistance, NOAA has
          administered an additional incentive for state participation in
          the program. Known as the "consistency provisions," Section 312
          of the Act requires that, once a program is approved, Federal
          actions directly affecting a state's coastal zone must be
          consistent with that approved program. NOAA remains responsible
          for continuous monitoring and evaluation of state programs to
          ensure their conformance to the CZMA and, therefore, the ability
          of the states to require Federal consistency.

          The 1976 amendments to the CZMA established a ten-year, $1.2
          billion Coastal Energy Impact Program to provide financial
          assistance to coastal states and communities affected by coastal
          energy activity. These amendments recognized the fact that the
          coastal zone provides an attractive site for much of the
          Nation's energy activities, including power plants, refineries
          and offshore oil and gas development. NOAA was responsible for
          administering this program which was designed to help states
          with approved coastal zone programs deal with the economic,
          social and environmental costs associated with energy
          development.

          Section 315 of the CZMA authorized NOAA to participate with
          states in a 50/50 cost-sharing program to acquire and manage
          special, relatively undisturbed estuarine areas set aside to
          serve as natural field laboratories in which to study and gather
          data on the natural and human processes occurring within those
          critical environments. NOAA began immediately to establish a
          nationwide network of biologically and geographically unique
          estuarine "reserves" and, by September 30, 1980, nine such
          sanctuaries were already in operation in: Oregon, Georgia,
          Hawaii, Ohio, Florida, California, Washington, and Rhode Island.

          A similar program to protect unique areas of ocean waters was
          authorized by Title III of the Marine Protection, Research and
          Sanctuaries Act (MPRSA) enacted in 1972. This legislation
          authorizes the Secretary of Commerce, with the approval of the
          President, to designate ocean waters as marine sanctuaries for
          the purpose of preserving or restoring their conservation,
          recreational, ecological or esthetic value. The first such
          marine sanctuary, was designated in 1975 in waters off Cape
          Hatteras, North Carolina, to protect the wreckage of the Civil
          War iron-clad ship USS Monitor. As of September 30, 1980, two
          other sanctuaries had been designated:

                - the Key Largo Coral Reef Marine Sanctuary near Miami,
                Florida which protects a 100-square mile coral reef area
                adjacent to the John Pennekamp Coral Reef State Park; and

                - the Northern Channel Islands Marine Sanctuary off the
                California coast designated to protect an area vital to a
                number of species of marine birds and mammals.

          Throughout the seventies and eighties, NOAA has continued to
          implement the marine sanctuaries program to provide long-term,
          comprehensive management for these special marine areas focused
          on resource protection, public education and research/assessment
          aimed at improving marine resources management decisions and
          encouraging maximum public use consistent with resource
          protection.

   - 26 -

          In the area of marine pollution, Congress enacted two principal
          pieces of legislation in the 1970's which guided NOAA activities
          in this area. The 1972 Marine Protection, Research, and
          Sanctuaries Act, in addition to establishing the marine
          sanctuaries program, charged NOAA with monitoring and research
          on ocean dumping activities as well as research on the possible,
          long-range effects of pollution, overfishing, and man-induced
          changes in ocean ecosystems.

          The Ocean Pollution Research and Development and Monitoring
          Planning Act of 1978 (known as the Ocean Pollution Planning Act)
          recognized the need for a national program to investigate the
          fates and effects of pollutants on the marine environment and
          charged NOAA with lead-agency responsibility for developing and
          implementing a continuous five-year plan for such a program.
          Throughout the seventies and into the eighties, NOAA responded
          to these charges with a number of activities including:

                o dumpsite investigations and supporting laboratory
                research to determine the consequences of ocean dumping of
                dredged material and municipal and industrial wastes;

                o a comprehensive program of research to detect man-made
                changes in the ocean and Great Lakes environments which
                may have long-term, adverse consequences;

                o multi-disciplinary studies in selected coastal regions
                including the New York Bight, Puget Sound, Gulf of Mexico,
                and Great Lakes to improve understanding of the dynamics
                of these ecosystems and strengthen a capability to predict
                the effects of pollutants and other man-induced changes to
                those ecosystems;

                o scientific support to the Coast Guard in the event of a
                spill of oil or other hazardous material in coastal
                waters;

                o providing financial support for ocean pollution research
                development and monitoring projects under Section 6 of the
                National Ocean Pollution Planning Act; and

                o developing, and updating biannually, the comprehensive
                five-year Federal Ocean Pollution Research, Development
                and Monitoring Plan and ensuring Federal agency compliance
                with that Plan.

   Research and Development

          Throughout the seventies NOAA strengthened its research and
          development programs aimed at improving our understanding of the
          oceanic and atmospheric environments and applying that knowledge
          to the solution of environmental problems. Highlights of
          activities in the seventies (in addition to the marine pollution
          research described previously) include:

                o participation in the Global Weather Experiment conducted
                in 1978-1979; this "world's largest experiment" [28]
                involved 140 countries, five international organizations,
                5,000 technicians, and satellites from the United States,
                U.S.S.R., Japan and the European Space Agency. The
                Experiment was designed to produce a better understanding
                of atmospheric

   - 27 -

                conditions and processes in order to develop realistic
                extended range forecast models; assess the limits of
                predictability for weather systems; and design a global
                observing system for routine numerical prediction;

                o accelerated research on hurricane intensity and
                movement, including Project STORMFURY - an experiment
                designed to determine whether destructive hurricane winds
                could be reduced by cloud seeding;

                o the Florida Area Cumulus Experiment to test a hypothesis
                that stimulating cumulus cloud growth, through seeding,
                could produce significant increases in tropical rainfall;

                o a Federal-state cooperative program to evaluate the
                effectiveness of weather modification in the States of
                Utah and North Dakota; in a related area, pursuant to the
                Weather Modification Reporting Act of 1972, NOAA assumed
                responsibility for recording all non-federally supported
                weather modification activities in the U.S.;

                o accelerated research to determine the extent to which
                climate can be predicted and the extent of man's influence
                on climate. In addition to continuing activities like the
                Geophysical Monitoring for Climatic Change program, NOAA's
                involvement in climate-related activities was enhanced in
                1978 with passage of the National Climate Program Act,
                which charged the Agency with developing a National
                Climate Program Plan and coordinating the work of Federal
                and non-Federal participants to estimate climate trends
                and predict future changes;

                o expansion of participation in the National Sea Grant
                College Programs. By 1980, fourteen institutions had
                achieved Sea Grant College status and NOAA was supporting
                marine research, education and advisory services at over
                100 institutions around the Nation.

          One of the most exciting aspects of NOAA's research in the
          seventies involved undersea science. NOAA support for undersea
          research to address the Agency's scientific responsibilities
          began in 1971 with the establishment of the Manned Undersea
          Science and Technology Office (MUS&T). From 1971 to 1980, MUS&T
          conducted a program of support for submersible and habitat-based
          research designed to address three principal objectives (MUS&T
          Annual Report, FY 1972):

                - provide manned underwater and operational support for
                NOAA investigations involving marine resources and
                environmental problems which require human subsurface
                observations and data collection;

                - foster and coordinate manned undersea science projects
                with other federal and state agencies, industry, research
                institutions, and universities; and

                - develop scientific and technical criteria for civilian
                undersea facilities and platforms through the experience
                gained by using available habitats and submersibles.

   - 28 -

          Pursuant to this third objective, and with a fiscal year 1976
          appropriation of $1.5 million, MUS&T concentrated its efforts on
          completion of a feasibility study and conceptual design for
          OCEANLAB - a proposed large, mobile saturation submersible that
          could operate autonomously in a variety of underwater
          environments. The potentially high cost of such a multi-purpose
          facility, however, forced MUS&T, in consultation with the
          Department of Commerce, the Office of Management and Budget,
          Congress and the undersea research community, to re-evaluate the
          OCEANLAB concept. Pursuant to this 1978 review, which included
          an analysis of the scientific needs and requirements of the
          research community conducted by the National Research Council's
          Ocean Science Board, NOAA re-directed the MUS&T/OCEANLAB
          program. Instead of constructing a single, government-owned
          laboratory, NOAA's program, in cooperation with university-based
          research institutions, was to increase the use of existing
          habitats and to encourage scientists to use additional
          underwater tools and techniques such as saturation diving,
          submersibles and remotely operated vehicles. The policy guidance
          for this new direction was described in a 1980 document entitled
          "The Undersea Research Program of the National Oceanic and
          Atmospheric Administration." [29]

          In 1977, NOAA established the first regional underwater research
          facility. The underwater habitat, HYDROLAB, located in St.
          Croix, which had recently been acquired and refurbished by NOAA
          from the Perry Foundation, became the focal point of undersea
          research in the Caribbean. By the 1980's, NOAA was supporting a
          three-tiered undersea research program composed of:

                o five National Undersea Research Cooperative Programs
                including the St. Croix program;

                o NOAA's share of support for the deep submersible ALVIN
                (jointly funded with the Navy and the National Science
                Foundation) and a cooperative program to provide
                scientists with access to shallow-water submersibles and
                remotely-operated vehicles; and

                o pursuant to section 21(e) of the Outer Continental Shelf
                Lands Act Amendments of 1978, a program of research and
                development related to diver safety.

   Operational Weather Satellites

          NOAA's operational meteorological satellite program became a
          reality during the 1970's. The geostationary satellite
          experiment begun in 1966 was established as a continuous,
          operational program in 1974/75 with the launch of NASA's
          Synchronous Meteorological Satellites (SMS) 1 and 2; these
          satellites were the prototype for NOAA's Geostationary
          Operational Environmental Satellites (GOES). GOES-1, the first
          NOAA-owned and operated geostationary satellite, was launched on
          October 16, 1975. The first NOAA-funded satellite in the NOAA
          system of polar-orbiting environmental satellites was launched
          in June 1979. Throughout the seventies NOAA began to establish
          itself as a world leader in application of space-based observing
          systems to operational environmental forecasting and related
          services.

   - 29 -

          In November 1979, a Presidential directive assigned NOAA with
          responsibility for the development of an operational earth
          remote sensing program. LANDSAT, an experimental earth sensing
          satellite system, was initiated in 1972 with the launch of
          LANDSAT-1 by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration
          as a research and development program. NOAA was directed to
          assume operational responsibility for the system beginning in
          1983. With enactment of the Land Remote Sensing
          Commercialization Act of 1984, the Secretary of Commerce was
          authorized to commercialize the LANDSAT system and, in September
          1985, a contract was signed with the Earth Observation Satellite
          Company (EOSAT). EOSAT's original objective is to establish
          LANDSAT as a commercially unable [Ed. viable] civil remote
          sensing industry in ten years. EOSAT took responsibility for the
          operation of the current LANDSAT system October 18, 1985.

   Conclusion

          All of these examples illustrate the breadth and excitement of
          NOAA's experience during the seventies. This experience was
          preparing the new organization to emerge as a mature, cohesive
          agency focused on the science and services associated with
          predicting and responding to changes in the global earth
          environment.

   - 30 -
   NOAA IN THE EIGHTIES

          The 1980's have, similarly, been an exciting time for NOAA.
          Along with continuing commitment to control Federal spending,
          NOAA has remained committed to serving the Nation. The agency
          organization chart for NOAA in 1980 reflected many of the
          changes in responsibility and programmatic responsibilities
          wrought during the seventies. Five principal line offices had
          been created (largely as the result of an agency reorganization
          in 1977) to address major elements of the Agency's
          responsibilities:

                o The Office of Fisheries -- responsible for: managing and
                conserving fishery resources within 200 miles of the
                coast; protecting vital fish and marine mammal habitats;
                and promoting the economic development of the U.S. fishing
                industry.

                o The Office of Coastal Zone Management -- responsible
                for: the establishment of national policies on the use and
                protection of coastal areas; support to states for the
                development and implementation of coastal zone management
                programs (pursuant to the CZMA); and the protection of
                unique coastal areas through establishment of estuarine or
                marine sanctuaries.

                o The Office of Oceanic and Atmospheric Services --
                responsible for: the issuance of weather forecasts and
                warnings; the preparation of nautical and aeronautical
                charts and other navigational aids; management of the NOAA
                fleet; and operation of the largest environmental data
                storage and retrieval system in the world.

                o The Office of Research and Development -- responsible
                for: the support (in NOAA laboratories and in the academic
                community) for environmental research to support NOAA
                program needs; implementation of the Sea Grant program;
                and Federal leadership for interagency, international
                research programs like the Global Atmospheric Research
                Program (GARP).

                o The Office of Satellites -- responsible for: management
                of the Nation's operational weather satellite program; and
                the transition of the experimental land remote sensing
                (LANDSAT) program to an operational program.

          A new Office of Ocean Minerals and Energy, charged with
          implementing new statutory responsibilities for the regulation
          of deep seabed mining and ocean thermal energy conversion
          systems, was established in 1980. NOAA responsibilities to
          coordinate and develop five-year plans for marine pollution and
          climate activities throughout the Federal Government were
          carried out by the National Marine Pollution Program Office and
          the National Climate Program Office both housed within an Office
          of Policy and Planning which reported directly to the
          Administrator.

          NOAA entered the eighties with a number of unique physical
          assets including:

                o The Nation's largest civil oceanographic research and
                hydrographic survey fleet as well as a fleet of research
                and weather reconnaissance aircraft.

   - 31 -

                o The Nation's only civilian operational satellite system
                including: geostationary satellites which, in orbit 22,000
                miles above a fixed point on the equator, provide
                continuous monitoring of environmental conditions like
                hurricanes and tropical storms; polar-orbiting satellites
                which orbit 522 miles above the earth and monitor global
                environmental conditions such as atmospheric temperatures,
                snow and ice fields, and cloud cover; and the land remote
                sensing satellite (LANDSAT) system which was initiated as
                an experimental system by NASA in 1972.

                o An extensive computing capability across the country
                with the principal, large-scale, advanced computing
                facility located in Suitland, Maryland in support of
                meteorological and satellite programs; and

                o A major national asset in the form of a network of
                research laboratories across the country including:

                - the Environmental Research Laboratory (ERL) system
                (headquartered in Boulder) which managed four atmospheric,
                two oceanographic and five multi-disciplinary
                laboratories;

                - twenty National Marine Fisheries Service laboratories
                supporting biological and ecological research; and

                - ten other laboratories and facilities for applied
                research and development focused on the need for new
                technology applications to improve NOAA services.

          Thus, NOAA entered the 1980's well-prepared to start a second
          decade committed to fulfilling it's numerous statutory
          responsibilities including those enacted during the height of
          the environmental movement in the 1970's; and exercising the
          mandate of Reorganization Plan No. 4 as the Nation's lead
          oceanic and atmospheric science and service agency.

          During the 1980's, NOAA leadership has worked to more clearly
          focus the agency's attention on the highest priority Federal
          responsibilities in environmental science and services. Agency
          management was refined with an eye towards simplicity and the
          efficient management and direction of related programs. For
          example, the National Environmental Satellite, Data, and
          Information Service was created to consolidate NOAA's satellite
          and data management activities. Similarly, NOAA's ocean and
          coastal resource management activities were combined with
          mapping, charting and geodetic programs into the National Ocean
          Service. The old Office of Research and Development has evolved
          into the Office of Oceanic and Atmospheric Research which now
          manages major research efforts to support improvements to NOAA's
          service arms, and fulfill the agency's responsibilities for
          leadership in science to improve our understanding of the
          oceanic and atmospheric components of the global earth system.
          Throughout the 1980's, management and programmatic decisions
          have all focused on successful fulfillment of NOAA's primary
          mission and ultimate goal -- the prediction of environmental
          changes on a wide range of time and space scales in order to
          protect life and property and provide industry and government
          decision-makers with a reliable base of scientific information.
          The following sections summarize some of the highlights of this
          dynamic agency's recent history.

   - 32 -
   Weather Services

          Since the National Weather Service probably touches the lives of
          more of our citizens each day than any other element of NOAA, or
          Commerce for that matter, let's start there. The 1980's have
          seen NOAA and the Department of Commerce embark on a billion
          dollar effort to modernize the National Weather Service. The
          modernization is largely founded on the implementation of three
          new technologies referred to as NEXRAD, AWIPS and ASOS. These
          programs will provide tomorrow's forecasters with advanced tools
          for observing and forecasting small-scale, fast breaking weather
          events like tornadoes, severe thunderstorms, and flash floods --
          weather events which annually claim an average of 60 lives and
          hundreds of millions of dollars in damage in this country alone.

          The weather radar is a valuable instrument for detecting and
          monitoring the movement and development of severe storms. It is
          a byproduct of the radar technology developed during the second
          World War in the 1940's. But the units in today's national radar
          network are limited in that they cannot routinely detect weather
          phenomena indicative of tornado development. Nor can they detect
          accurate rainfall amounts or precise areal coverage of rainfall.
          Because of their age and limited spare parts, these radar units
          are difficult to service.

          Formal efforts to procure a national next generation radar --
          NEXRAD -- system began in fiscal year 1983 with funding for
          technology validation. The Weather Service hopes to begin
          deployment of the radar by 1990. It will incorporate technology
          that is expected to advance tornado warnings from one to two
          minutes to more than 20 minutes. NEXRAD also will provide
          valuable precipitation rate and areal information to improve
          flood and flash-flood warnings and water management forecast
          services when used with computer models of drainage basins.

          A key feature of the NEXRAD radars is the application of the
          so-called "Doppler Effect," named after the Austrian physicist
          Johann Christian Doppler who determined that moving objects
          shift the frequency of sound, light or radio waves that they
          emit or reflect. An example of a Doppler frequency shift is not
          real, only apparent, as in the case of a blaring automobile horn
          that is first high and then drops in pitch as the car approaches
          and then passes an observer.

          In its application to weather radar, the "Doppler Effect" allows
          the operator to "see" a storm's wind-carried rain that is moving
          away from or towards the radar. This unprecedented view of winds
          gives a direct and clear indication of wind rotation and hence
          tornadoes in their development stage.

          Forecasters will gain a new perspective of dangerous storms by
          viewing them over their entire life cycle with NEXRAD radar
          units and the higher resolution sensors carried by the new
          GOES-NEXT satellites. Thus, they will be able to pinpoint the
          severe weather events more precisely from space, and they will
          have a better idea of what is going on inside them.

          Before 1978, forecasters at National Weather Service field
          offices communicated with the National centers and each other
          only via slow-speed teletype and facsimile circuits. Gathered
          information was prepared in the

   - 33 -

          forecast offices on clear acetate charts which separately
          depicted the various components of weather such as barometric
          pressure, wind, and rainfall. These charts would be overlaid on
          a light table so the forecasters could visually assimilate the
          "big picture" upon which to base their forecasts.

          Today, the forecasters rely on a computer-based system called
          Automation of Field Operations Services (AFOS) for
          communications and data display. AFOS utilizes high-speed
          computers, databases supported by mini-computers at each field
          office, and the manipulation of data displayed on screens. This
          system is outdated, however, and will be obsolete by 1990. It
          lacks the capability to integrate the large-scale guidance
          material, supplied by the National Centers, with radar and
          satellite imagery for the local forecaster's area of
          responsibility. This limitation of the AFOS system is becoming
          even more severe as the quantity and quality of the fine-scale
          data continue to increase and improved methods of processing,
          displaying and analyzing these data continue to emerge.
          According to Richard Hallgren, Director of the Weather Service,
          "a keystone of the modernization effort at the National Weather
          Service is the Advanced Weather Interactive Processing System
          for the 1990's, otherwise known as AWIPS-90, which will replace
          the AFOS system."

          AWIPS will provide weather forecasters at field offices and the
          National Centers with the capability to access, overlay, and
          interactively process meteorological and hydrological guidance
          products and data, including Doppler radar and new satellite
          imagery.

          Providing substantial support for the evolution of AWIPS was a
          NOAA research effort known as the Program for Regional Observing
          and Forecasting Services (PROFS) which began in 1980/81. The
          mission of PROFS is to improve operational weather services by
          testing and transferring advances in science and technology.
          PROFS, using the results of atmospheric and systems research,
          develops operationally-feasible forecast technology that
          incorporates observations, computer processing, and human
          interaction. PROFS integrates capabilities into specific
          systems, then tests and evaluates those systems in forecasting
          exercises. PROFS works closely with the three major operational
          weather services, NWS, FAA and the U.S. Air Force Air Weather
          Service. In 1986 PROFS initiated the Denver AWIPS Risk Reduction
          and Requirements Evaluation (DARRE) project; by designing,
          installing and operating an advanced interactive forecaster
          workstation at the Denver Weather Service Forecast Office (at
          Denver airport), PROFS is providing the National Weather Service
          with a test-bed for many of the functional capabilities planned
          for the AWIPS system.

          Observations describing the current state of the atmosphere and
          or river conditions are the basis of severe weather and flood
          warnings as well as fair weather forecasts. Daily, the National
          Weather Service collects a multitude of such observations from
          surface and upper-air stations across the country. Satellites,
          offshore buoys, aircraft, volunteers aboard seagoing vessels,
          and other sources contribute many more thousands of
          observations. Th
